Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska37-1218
Motorboat; registration transmitted
to Game and Parks Commission; when; duplicate copy.

Each
county treasurer providing registration to an owner of a vessel
shall transmit on or before the thirtieth day of the following month registration
information to the commission. The county treasurer shall retain a
duplicate copy of the registration.

Laws 1978, LB 21, § 18;

Laws 1996, LB 464, § 6;

Laws 2001, LB 131, § 2;

Laws 2012, LB801, § 10.